Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202045-605
Board; duties; application for license; filing; issuance; denial; appeal.

The board shall be responsible for the administration of the Collection Agency Act. All applications for licenses provided for in the act shall be made to the board. If the applicant is an individual, the application shall include the applicant's social security number. The board shall investigate the qualifications of each applicant for a license. Based on the results of the investigation, the board may either issue a license to the applicant upon the payment of the license fee and any processing fee allowed under section 45-605.01 and the furnishing of the bond provided for in section 45-608 or refuse to issue such license. The action of the board may be appealed, and the appeal shall be in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.

Laws 1963, c. 500, § 9, p. 1595;

R.S.1943, (1981), § 81-8,166;

Laws 1984, LB 471, § 5;

Laws 1988, LB 352, § 75;

Laws 1993, LB 261, § 5;

Laws 1997, LB 752, § 117;

Laws 2020, LB909, § 27.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.